Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 9.1 Restricting Membership in Retirement System to Teachers and State Employees

36-9.1-1.
Findings.

The general assembly hereby finds the following: The grant of the opportunity to an individual to purchase, pursuant to P.L. 1987, ch. 613 as codified in § 36-9-33 (repealed by P.L. 88-486), (hereinafter “§ 36-9-33, repealed“), credit in, and/or to become a member of the retirement systems established under chapter 16 of title 16, chapter 21 of title 45, and/or chapters 8 — 10 of this title (”retirement systems”) bears no rational relationship to any legitimate governmental purpose. The continued accrual of benefits by the beneficiaries of § 36-9-33 (repealed) and the continued payment of money under § 36-9-33 (repealed) will cause an invasion of the corpus of the retirement systems funds in abrogation of those sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as amended from time to time which apply to governmental plans (including but not limited to 401(a) and 401(f)) and does not further the purposes behind the retirement systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 413, § 1.

36-9.1-2.
Status of non-employee and non-teacher members.

Any individual who became a member of the retirement systems based solely on § 36-9-33 (repealed) or who purchased credit in the retirement systems based upon § 36-9-33 (repealed) shall no longer be entitled to membership and/or credit(s) and shall no longer receive any benefits of any type from the retirement systems which were based upon § 36-9-33 (repealed). By January 1, 1995, the retirement system shall return any contributions or purchases made pursuant to § 36-9-33 (repealed) by the individual and/or the individual’s employer with interest at the actuarially assumed rate earned by the retirement systems on its pension funds during the applicable time period since the contributions and/or purchase was made.

The return of contributions or purchases shall be offset by any benefits already received by the individual from the retirement system.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting any individual from later becoming a member of the retirement systems or purchasing credits in accordance with applicable law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 413, § 1.